Montana, session 2025, SB43.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

SECTION 1. Section 27-19-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"27-19-101. Definition of injunction -- by whom granted -- against whom granted. (1) An
injunction is an order requiring a person to refrain from a particular act. The order may be granted by the court
in which the action is brought or by a judge thereof of the court and, when made by a judge, be enforced as the
order of the court.
(2) (a) When an injunction is granted by a district court judge it is only enforceable in the judicial
district in which it was granted.
(b) If statewide enforcement of the injunction is sought, an action for injunction must be appealed
to the supreme court."

Section 2. Section 27-19-103, MCA, is amended to read:
"27-19-103. When injunction may not be granted. An injunction cannot may not be granted:
(1) to stay a judicial proceeding pending at the commencement of an action in which the injunction
is demanded, unless such restraint is necessary to prevent a multiplicity of such proceedings;
(2) to stay proceedings in a court of the United States;
(3) to stay proceedings in another state upon a judgment of a court of that state;
(4) to prevent the execution of a public statute by officers of the law for the public benefit;
(5) to prevent the breach of a contract the performance of which would not be specifically
enforced;
(6) to prevent the exercise of a public or private office, in a lawful manner, by the person in
possession;
(7) to prevent a legislative act by a municipal corporation;
(8) in labor disputes under any other or different circumstances or conditions than if the
controversy were of another or different character or between parties neither or none of whom were laborers or
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 43

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0043.2
interested in labor questions; or
(9) to prevent the secretary of state from issuing a temporary or final administrative rule before the
administrative rule is issued; or
(10) to restrain the enforcement of a statute against a nonparty to the proceedings before the
DISTRICT court. An injunction to restrain the enforcement of a statute to remedy a constitutional violation must
directly address and bear a substantial connection to the violation and may not require more than is necessary
to ensure compliance by the parties before the court."
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 43